Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-14] Confidentiality of examination
information. (a) Names and individual identification data for all owners,
purchasers, and insureds shall be considered private and confidential
information and shall not be disclosed by the commissioner, unless the
disclosure is to another regulator or is required by law.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, all examination reports, working papers, recorded information,
documents and copies thereof produced by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner
or any other person in the course of an examination made under this chapter, or
in the course of analysis or investigation by the commissioner of the financial
condition or market conduct of a licensee, shall be confidential by law and
privileged, shall not be subject to chapter 92F, shall not be subject to
subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in
any private civil action. The commissioner is authorized to use the documents,
materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal
action brought as part of the commissioner's official duties. The licensee
being examined may have access to all documents used to make the report. [L
2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next